Utah statutes.
32A-12-601 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1) (a)  For purposes of Section 32A-12-602, "exclusion" is as defined in 27 C.F.R. Sections 8.51 through 8.54.

(b)  For purposes of Section 32A-12-603, "exclusion" is as defined in 27 C.F.R. Sections 6.151 through 6.153.

(2) (a)  "Industry member" means:

(i)  an alcoholic beverage manufacturer;

(ii)  a producer;

(iii)  a supplier;

(iv)  an importer;

(v)  a wholesaler;

(vi)  a bottler;

(vii)  a warehouser and bottler; or

(viii)  for a person described in Subsections (2)(a)(i) through (vii), any of its:

(A)  affiliates;

(B)  subsidiaries;

(C)  officers;

(D)  directors;

(E)  partners;

(F)  agents;

(G)  employees; or

(H)  representatives.

(b)  "Industry member" does not include:

(i)  the commission;

(ii)  the department; or

(iii)  any of the commission's or department's officers or employees.

(3)  "Retailer" means:

(a)  the holder of an alcoholic beverage license or permit issued by the commission or by local authority to allow the holder to engage in the sale of alcoholic beverages to consumers whether for consumption on or off the premises; or

(b)  any of the holder's, agents, officers, directors, shareholders, partners, or employees.

